Massachusetts, session 194th, H146.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 94G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
in the first sentence of subsection (a) paragraph (1) after the word “resources” the following
words:-
;provided that the maximum batch size required by the Commission shall not be smaller
than 25 pounds.
SECTION 2. Section 15 of chapter 94G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
in the last sentence of subsection (a) paragraph (1) after the word “ingredients.” the following
words:-
The commission, in collaboration with MDAR, the Cannabis Advisory Board,
Independent Testing Labs and Marijuana Establishments, shall review such regulations and
testing protocols, including, but not limited to, its testing batch size requirements, residual and
pesticide limits, and “Total Viable Aerobic Bacteria (CFU/g)” and “Total Yeast and Mold
of 4

(CFU/g)” tests, on an annual basis to ensure compliance with the most recent industry standards,
research, data, and typical microbial composition in an outdoor grow in New England using best
cultivation practices. The commission shall report its findings and plans to update such
regulations and testing protocols to the relevant appointing authorities and the state legislature on
a bi-annual basis.
SECTION 3. Section 15 of chapter 94G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
in the first sentence of subsection (a) paragraph (1) after the word “ingredients.” the following
words:-
“The commission shall not require testing of environmental media (e.g. soils, solid
growing media, and water) beyond finished marijuana and marijuana product testing.”
SECTION 4. Chapter 94G of the Massachusetts General Laws shall be amended by
adding after Section 22, the following section:
Section 23.
(a) The Commission shall collect, compile, and make available to the public on its Open
Data Platform, the following data from independent testing laboratories as defined in Section 15
of this Chapter:
Industry average for,
1) Failure rates for Pesticides
2) Failure rates for Heavy metals
3) Failure rates for Microbiological contaminants
of 4

4) Failure rates for Residual solvents
5) Failure rates for Mycotoxins
6) Total THC for flower
7) Total THC for Marijuana Vaporizer Devices
8) Total THC for concentrates
Per licensed Independent Testing Laboratory, their average for
1) Failure rates for Pesticides
2) Failure rates for Heavy metals
3) Failure rates for Microbiological contaminants
4) Failure rates for Residual solvents
5) Failure rates for Mycotoxins
6) Total THC for flower
7) Total THC for Marijuana Vaporizer Devices
8) Total THC for concentrates
(b)The initial data report shall include all prior Independent Testing Laboratory data
submitted to the Commission. The initial report shall be published per Independent Testing
Laboratory per quarter inclusive of reports. Subsequent data reports shall be updated and
published on a quarterly basis detailing information from the preceding quarter.
of 4

(c)The Commission shall investigate and publicly report the reason for the discrepancy
for individual Independent Testing Laboratories that are statistically significant outliers in terms
of their testing results.
(d)The Commission shall promulgate regulations in accordance with this section no later
than one year after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. The commission shall promulgate or amend regulations as necessary to be
consistent with Section 1-4 not later than 365 days from the effective date of this act.
of 4